sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
abolire/M po:verbu
acanire/M po:verbu
achipire/M po:verbu
achirire/M po:verbu
acollire/M po:verbu
acollogire/M po:verbu
acrarire/M po:verbu
acudire/M po:verbu
acumprire/M po:verbu
acunsentire/M po:verbu
adduire/M po:verbu
aderire/M po:verbu
afallire/M po:verbu
afigire/M po:verbu
afligire/M po:verbu
afortire/M po:verbu
afranchire/M po:verbu
afrigire/M po:verbu
afutire/M po:verbu
agire/M po:verbu
agredire/M po:verbu
allichidire/M po:verbu
allurpire/M po:verbu
ammanire/M po:verbu
aplaudire/M po:verbu
aporrire/M po:verbu
aprofundire/M po:verbu
arrepentire/M po:verbu
arrichire/M po:verbu
arrostire/M po:verbu
arrustire/M po:verbu
assistire/M po:verbu
assoddire/M po:verbu
assortire/M po:verbu
assubrire/M po:verbu
assuddire/M po:verbu
assuprire/M po:verbu
atibbire/M po:verbu
atibire/M po:verbu
atribuire/M po:verbu
atrivire/M po:verbu
atullire/M po:verbu
aturdire/M po:verbu
atzivire/M po:verbu
atzuddire/M po:verbu
atzutzuddire/M po:verbu
aunire/M po:verbu
aurtire/M po:verbu
avilire/M po:verbu
bandire/M po:verbu
baranta/N po:numerale
batire/M po:verbu
batorghentos/N po:numerale
bermire/M po:verbu
bestire/M po:verbu
binti/N po:numerale
boddire/M po:verbu
buddire/M po:verbu
butonire/M po:verbu
caire/M po:verbu
candire/M po:verbu
cannire/M po:verbu
carpire/M po:verbu
chessire/M po:verbu
chigire/M po:verbu
chimbanta/N po:numerale
chimbighentos/N po:numerale
chimire/M po:verbu
chinnire/M po:verbu
chischire/M po:verbu
chiscire/M po:verbu
chissire/M po:verbu
chistire/M po:verbu
chitire/M po:verbu
chitzire/M po:verbu
colligire/M po:verbu
collire/M po:verbu
colloire/M po:verbu
colorire/M po:verbu
commitire/M po:verbu
concruire/M po:verbu
conduire/M po:verbu
confugire/M po:verbu
consumire/M po:verbu
contribuire/M po:verbu
controire/M po:verbu
contzebire/M po:verbu
corfire/M po:verbu
corpire/M po:verbu
cortire/M po:verbu
cosire/M po:verbu
costituire/M po:verbu
costoire/M po:verbu
crarire/M po:verbu
crochire/M po:verbu
crompire/M po:verbu
cubire/M po:verbu
cumparire/M po:verbu
cumpartire/M po:verbu
cumpartzire/M po:verbu
cumpatire/M po:verbu
cumprire/M po:verbu
cundire/M po:verbu
cunduire/M po:verbu
cunferire/M po:verbu
cunfìgire/M po:verbu
cunsentire/M po:verbu
cunsighire/M po:verbu
cuntribuire/M po:verbu
cuntzebire/M po:verbu
cuntzepire/M po:verbu
cunvertire/M po:verbu
curregire/M po:verbu
cuscurire/M po:verbu
custoire/M po:verbu
decadire/M po:verbu
decaire/M po:verbu
deduire/M po:verbu
definire/M po:verbu
demprire/M po:verbu
deperire/M po:verbu
desfallire/M po:verbu
dessinire/M po:verbu
destituire/M po:verbu
destruire/M po:verbu
detraire/M po:verbu
diferire/M po:verbu
digerire/M po:verbu
dighire/M po:verbu
digirire/M po:verbu
diluire/M po:verbu
diminuire/M po:verbu
dimitire/M po:verbu
dimprire/M po:verbu
dirigire/M po:verbu
discinire/M po:verbu
disdire/M po:verbu
dispedire/M po:verbu
dissalire/M po:verbu
distruire/M po:verbu
disunire/M po:verbu
dividire/M po:verbu
drillire/M po:verbu
dughentos/N po:numerale
eligire/M po:verbu
eremire/M po:verbu
escluire/M po:verbu
esimire/M po:verbu
esordire/M po:verbu
estremessire/M po:verbu
faddire/M po:verbu
fartzire/M po:verbu
fertzire/M po:verbu
figire/M po:verbu
finire/M po:verbu
foressire/M po:verbu
fritire/M po:verbu
frobire/M po:verbu
fruire/M po:verbu
frunire/M po:verbu
frusire/M po:verbu
fuire/M po:verbu
gannire/M po:verbu
gestire/M po:verbu
giannire/M po:verbu
godire/M po:verbu
grunnire/M po:verbu
gurrire/M po:verbu
illegire/M po:verbu
illetzire/M po:verbu
illuire/M po:verbu
imbastire/M po:verbu
imbestire/M po:verbu
imbutire/M po:verbu
impoverire/M po:verbu
imprimire/M po:verbu
incanire/M po:verbu
inchigire/M po:verbu
inchisire/M po:verbu
incoragire/M po:verbu
incrinire/M po:verbu
incumprire/M po:verbu
inferchire/M po:verbu
influire/M po:verbu
ingalanire/M po:verbu
ingraire/M po:verbu
ingroghire/M po:verbu
ingurtire/M po:verbu
inserire/M po:verbu
interagire/M po:verbu
intimidire/M po:verbu
introduire/M po:verbu
intzidire/M po:verbu
irrichire/M po:verbu
isbaire/M po:verbu
isbertire/M po:verbu
isbiorire/M po:verbu
isbrigongire/M po:verbu
iscalagire/M po:verbu
iscandire/M po:verbu
iscanzire/M po:verbu
iscaressire/M po:verbu
iscassiddire/M po:verbu
ischighitzire/M po:verbu
ischinnire/M po:verbu
ischitire/M po:verbu
isciaddire/M po:verbu
iscolorire/M po:verbu
iscrarire/M po:verbu
iscumaparire/M po:verbu
iscundire/M po:verbu
iscurire/M po:verbu
isfatziddire/M po:verbu
isfianchire/M po:verbu
isfranchire/M po:verbu
isfrunire/M po:verbu
isfutire/M po:verbu
islangire/M po:verbu
ismarrire/M po:verbu
ismurfire/M po:verbu
isparire/M po:verbu
ispaurire/M po:verbu
ispilire/M po:verbu
ispitire/M po:verbu
ispreudire/M po:verbu
isputzire/M po:verbu
istabilire/M po:verbu
istibire/M po:verbu
istichire/M po:verbu
istrafuddire/M po:verbu
istransire/M po:verbu
istrobeire/M po:verbu
isturdire/M po:verbu
lambrire/M po:verbu
launire/M po:verbu
limire/M po:verbu
luire/M po:verbu
martzire/M po:verbu
medire/M po:verbu
minuire/M po:verbu
muire/M po:verbu
mutire/M po:verbu
naro/L po:verbu st:nàrrere 
nàrrere/L po:verbu
nisire/M po:verbu
noighentos/N po:numerale
noranta/N po:numerale
nutrire/M po:verbu
oire/M po:verbu
oprimire/M po:verbu
orire/M po:verbu
otanta/N po:numerale
otighentos/NX po:numerale
partire/M po:verbu
partzire/M po:verbu
pedire/M po:verbu
percuisire/M po:verbu
persighire/M po:verbu
pervertire/M po:verbu
petire/M po:verbu
pintzire/M po:verbu
pistiddire/M po:verbu
porrire/M po:verbu
preferire/M po:verbu
presumire/M po:verbu
previdire/M po:verbu
produire/M po:verbu
proibire/M po:verbu
protzedire/M po:verbu
pubujonire/M po:verbu
pudrire/M po:verbu
pulire/M po:verbu
punire/M po:verbu
ranchire/M po:agetivu
rebentire/M po:verbu
recaire/M po:verbu
recuisire/M po:verbu
referire/M po:verbu
remenire/M po:verbu
rempuddire/M po:verbu
reperire/M po:verbu
resumire/M po:verbu
retzire/M po:verbu
ribaire/M po:verbu
riduire/M po:verbu
rifinire/M po:verbu
ristabilire/M po:verbu
rivestire/M po:verbu
rugire/M po:verbu
saddire/M po:verbu
sannire/M po:verbu
sartzire/M po:verbu
sentire/M po:verbu
seschentos/N po:numerale
sessanta/N po:numerale
setanta/N po:numerale
setighentos/N po:numerale
siddire/M po:verbu
sigire/M po:verbu
sirionire/M po:verbu
sordire/M po:verbu
subire/M po:verbu
suddire/M po:verbu
sugerire/M po:verbu
sumuddire/M po:verbu
supentire/M po:verbu
suprire/M po:verbu
surtzire/M po:verbu
sussìstire/M po:verbu
tasire/M po:verbu
tintirire/M po:verbu
tipire/M po:verbu
traduire/M po:verbu
transire/M po:verbu
trasgredire/M po:verbu
trasmitire/M po:verbu
travestire/M po:verbu
treghentos/N po:numerale
trinnire/M po:verbu
trinta/N po:numerale
trobeire/M po:verbu
trontzire/M po:verbu
tullire/M po:verbu
tussire/M po:verbu
tzapugnire/M po:verbu
tzibire/M po:verbu
tzitire/M po:verbu
tzuncunire/M po:verbu
umprire/M po:verbu
urturgire/M po:verbu
